Vermont, session 2025-2026, H887.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 495d is amended to read:
§ 495d. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
* * *
(15) “Crime victim” means any of the following:
(A) a person who has obtained a relief from abuse order issued under
15 V.S.A. § 1103;
(B) a person who has obtained an order against stalking or sexual
assault issued under 12 V.S.A. chapter 178;
(C) a person who has obtained an order against abuse of a vulnerable
adult issued under 33 V.S.A. chapter 69; or
(D)(i) a victim as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 5301, provided that the
victim is identified as a crime victim in an affidavit filed by a law enforcement
official with a prosecuting attorney of competent state or federal jurisdiction;
and
(ii) shall include the victim’s child, foster child, parent, spouse,
stepchild or ward of the victim who lives with the victim, or a parent of the
VT LEG #388157 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE H.887
2026 Page 2 of 3
victim’s spouse, provided that the individual is not identified in the affidavit as
the defendant; or
(E) a person who is a survivor of domestic violence, sexual assault,
or stalking and who has supporting documentation from any one of the
following sources:
(i) a court or law enforcement or other government agency;
(ii) a domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking assistance
program;
(iii) a legal, clerical, medical, or other professional from whom the
person has received counseling or other assistance concerning domestic
violence, sexual assault, or stalking; or
(iv) a self-attestation by the person describing the circumstances
supporting the person’s status as a survivor of domestic violence, sexual
assault, and stalking for which no further corroboration shall be required unless
otherwise mandated by law.
* * *
(18) “Domestic violence” has the same meaning as in 15 V.S.A. § 1151
and includes the definition of “abuse” in 15 V.S.A. § 1101.
(19) “Sexual assault” has the same meaning as in 12 V.S.A. § 5131.
(20) “Stalking” has the same meaning as in 12 V.S.A. § 5131.
VT LEG #388157 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE H.887
2026 Page 3 of 3
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #388157 v.1